Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
YOUTH ADVISORY GROUP
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall establish  a work group to develop
standards that are used to select the members of  the youth advisory group established by
section 4 of this 2024 Act.
(2) The  work group shall consist of members selected by the Deputy Superintendent of
Public Instruction in  consultation with the Youth Development Division, the Oregon Health
Authority and the Racial Justice Council.
(3) To the greatest extent practicable, the work group shall consist of:
(a) Youth representing tribal youth councils;
(b) Youth representing youth and student leadership organizations;
(c) Youth participating in alternative education pathways;
(d) Youth from immigrant and refugee communities;
(e) Individuals representing culturally and ethnically specific community-based organiza-
tions, including organizations that assist immigrant and refugee communities;
(f) Individuals who are administrators, teachers and other school staff who support youth
and student leadership in public  schools, including education service districts, school dis-
tricts, schools and youth reengagement programs;
(g) Youth who serve as advisors to the State Board of Education  or serve on Department
of Education work groups related to student success initiatives;
(h) Youth who serve on the Youth Development Council or who participate in  Youth
Development Division programs;
(i) Youth who serve on Oregon Health Authority work groups;
(j) Youth who serve on Racial Justice Council work groups; and
(k) Additional members identified and recommended by the work group.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 1
(4) Members of the  work group selected as provided by subsection (3) of this section must
consist of individuals who:
(a) Have lived experiences with, or a demonstrated understanding of, issues  facing per-
sons who are from racial or ethnic communities that historically have been, or currently are,
underrepresented or underserved, including communities for which a statewide  education
plan has been developed and implemented;
(b) Have lived experiences with, or a demonstrated understanding of, issues  facing per-
sons who identify as lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender,  queer, two-spirit, intersex, asexual,
nonbinary or another minority gender identity or sexual orientation;
(c) Are English language learners;
(d) Are identifiable as being a child with a disability, as defined in ORS 343.035;
(e) Are navigating poverty;
(f) Are a foster child or have a parent involved in the criminal justice system; or
(g) Have experienced disproportionate results in education due to historical  practices, as
identified by the State Board of Education by rule.
(5) Youth members of the work group selected  as provided by subsection (3) of this sec-
tion must be between the ages of 14 and 18 years during their term of service on  the work
group.
(6) The work group shall:
(a) Develop a process for individuals to apply to become a member of  the youth advisory
group, based on considerations of equity.
(b) Develop and implement a youth  outreach and recruitment plan for connecting with
prospective members of the youth advisory group.
(c) Review applications of prospective members of the youth advisory group and recom-
mend to the  Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction prospective members of the youth
advisory group.
(d) Develop the orientation for members of the youth advisory group.
(e) Work to reduce bias and  remove barriers related to becoming a member of the youth
advisory group and to support members of the youth advisory group.
(f) Develop recommendations and best practices for  providing mentorship to youth
members of the youth advisory group.
(g) Explore the  viability of providing stipends and academic credit for youth members of
the youth advisory group.
SECTION 2.
The work group established by section 1 of this 2024 Act must first meet
no later than October 31, 2024.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on August 30, 2025.
SECTION 4. (1) A youth advisory group is established for the purposes of this section.
(2)(a) The Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction, in consultation with  the work
group established by section 1 of this  2024 Act, shall select members of the youth advisory
group as provided by this subsection. The term of office of each member is one year.
(b) The majority  of the members of the youth advisory group must be youth between the
ages of 14 and 18 years of age during their  term of service on the youth advisory group. The
youth members of the youth advisory  group must include two youth from each education
service district identified in ORS 334.013.
(c) When selecting  the members of the youth advisory group, the Deputy Superintendent
of Public Instruction shall:
(A) Consult with the Youth Development Division,  the Oregon Health Authority and the
Racial Justice Council to select members of the youth advisory group who are one or  more
of the following:
(i) Youth and staff representing tribal youth councils;
(ii) Youth and staff representing youth and student leadership organizations;
(iii) Youth and staff representing alternative education pathways;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 2
(iv) Youth from immigrant and refugee communities;
(v) Individuals representing culturally and ethnically specific community-based organiza-
tions, including organizations that assist immigrant and refugee communities;
(vi) Individuals who are administrators, teachers and other school staff  who support
youth and student leadership in public  schools, including education service districts, school
districts, schools and youth reengagement programs;
(vii) Youth who serve as advisors to the State Board of Education or serve on Depart-
ment of Education work groups related to student success initiatives;
(viii) Youth who serve  on the Youth Development Council or who participate in Youth
Development Division programs;
(ix) Youth who serve on Oregon Health Authority work groups;
(x) Youth who serve on Racial Justice Council work groups; and
(xi) Additional members identified and recommended by the youth advisory group.
(B) Consult with the Youth Development Division to select  members of the youth advi-
sory group who  are youth who have been reengaged and to select program staff who support
the statewide youth reengagement system developed and administered  by the division under
ORS 417.859 or  who otherwise provide education opportunities to youth or support the edu-
cational success of youth.
(d) In addition to the members of the youth  advisory group described in paragraphs (b)
and (c) of this subsection, the youth advisory  group may include any other members identi-
fied and recommended by the youth advisory group and selected by the  Deputy Superinten-
dent of Public Instruction in consultation with the work group established by section  1 of
this 2024 Act.
(e) The Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction may provide for  alternate members
for the youth members of the youth advisory group described in  paragraph (b) of this sub-
section.
(f)(A) When making selections under this subsection, the Deputy Superintendent  of
Public Instruction must ensure that:
(i) At least 70 percent of the members of  the youth advisory group have lived experiences
with, or a demonstrated understanding of, issues facing persons who  are from racial or
ethnic communities that historically  have been, or currently are, underrepresented or
underserved;
(ii) At least 50 percent of the youth members of the youth advisory group from each of
the regions identified in paragraph (b)  of this subsection have lived experiences with, or a
demonstrated understanding of, issues facing persons who are  from racial or ethnic com-
munities that historically have been, or currently are, underrepresented or underserved;  and
(iii) The youth members of the youth advisory group must include youth who:
(I) Have lived experiences with, or a demonstrated understanding of, issues  facing per-
sons who identify as lesbian,  gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, two-spirit, intersex, asexual,
nonbinary or another minority gender identity or sexual orientation;
(II) Are English language learners;
(III) Are identified as being a child with a disability, as defined in ORS 343.035;
(IV) Are navigating poverty;
(V) Are a foster child or have a parent involved in the criminal justice system; or
(VI) Have experienced disproportionate results in education  due to historical practices,
as identified by the State Board of Education by rule.
(B) For the purpose of this paragraph, racial or ethnic communities that  historically
have been, or currently are,  underrepresented or underserved include communities for which
a statewide education plan has been developed and implemented.
(g) A member of the youth advisory group may be selected for up to two  terms. If there
is a vacancy for any cause, the Deputy Superintendent  of Public Instruction, in consultation
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 3
with other members of the youth advisory group, shall make a  selection to become imme-
diately effective for the unexpired term.
(3) The Department of Education shall  ensure that each youth member of the youth ad-
visory group:
(a) Receives sufficient support to enable participation in youth  advisory group meetings,
including:
(A) Reimbursement for actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred in  the
performance of official duties in the manner and amounts provided in ORS 292.495; and
(B) Funding for any expenses not  otherwise reimbursed under subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph; and
(b) Has  resources available to reimburse any adult who provides transportation or other
supports in helping the youth member to participate in the youth advisory group.
(4) The youth advisory group, with support from the  Department of Education, shall take
into consideration racial equity and justice and align with other statewide efforts  for racial
equity and justice when performing the following duties:
(a) Developing the youth advisory group’s goals,  success criteria and progress measures
related to youth and student leadership and engagement in the policymaking process  in this
state. When performing the duties  described in this paragraph, the youth advisory group
may modify the youth advisory group’s decision-making process, scope of work,  work plans
and meeting structures, and the roles  and responsibilities of youth advisory group members.
(b) Examining current  Department of Education, Youth Development Division and
Oregon Health Authority initiatives and  practices related to youth and student leadership
and engagement in the policymaking process and making recommendations on how to elevate
and support youth and student leadership and youth-led and  student-led accountability in the
policymaking process at the state and local level. When performing the  duties described in
this paragraph, the youth advisory group must give careful consideration to youth and stu-
dent leadership and to engagement by youth described in subsection (2)(f)(A)(ii) and (iii) of
this section. The youth advisory group  may recommend methods for evaluating current ini-
tiatives, practices and progress relating to  youth and student leadership and engagement at
the state level.
(c) Connecting with youth and student leaders and exploring youth and  student leader-
ship networks, including culturally and ethnically  specific, community-based models and
Youth Development Division programs,  to identify best practices in youth-led and student-led
accountability in this state  and on a national level. Based on the performance of the duties
described in this paragraph, the youth advisory group shall  make recommendations to the
State Board of Education,  the Youth Development Council, the Legislative Assembly and the
Governor on how to support  youth and student leadership networks on a regional level for
the purposes of connecting youths with youth organizations, connecting students with  stu-
dent organizations, elevating youth and student leadership  and voice and supporting youth-
led and student-led accountability,  with special consideration given to youth described in
subsection (2)(f)(A)(ii) and (iii) of this section.
(d) Helping the Department of Education, the Youth  Development Division and the
Oregon Health Authority with the surveys that are administered to youth and students by
assisting with reviews of the findings and making recommendations on the content  and ad-
ministration of the surveys.
(e) Evaluating current processes in this state to identify best  practices for youth and
students reporting a bias incident as defined in ORS 147.380 or  a hate or bias crime. Based
on the performance of the duty described in this paragraph, the youth advisory group shall
make recommendations for providing support to youth and  students who have experienced
bias incidents or hate or bias crimes.
(f) Reporting on the  youth advisory group’s work, progress and recommendations to the
Legislative Assembly and the Governor every two years and providing interim updates to
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 4
youth and student leadership networks and organizations, education  service districts, school
districts and local entities that serve youth and students.
(5)(a) The youth advisory group shall meet at least  six times each year on the dates de-
termined by a majority of the members of the youth advisory group. The  youth advisory
group shall also meet at other times specified or requested by a  majority of the members
of the youth advisory group.
(b) The youth advisory group shall meet in the place and manner determined by a ma-
jority of the members  of the youth advisory group. All or part of the members of the youth
advisory group may attend the  meetings electronically, unless otherwise provided by a ma-
jority of the members of the youth advisory group.
(6) The Department of Education shall:
(a) Provide staff support to the youth advisory group; and
(b) Support youth advisory group members in participating in the youth advisory group.
SECTION 5.
(1) The  Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction, in consultation with
the work group established by section 1 of this 2024 Act, shall select  the members of the
youth advisory group described in section 4 of this 2024 Act no later than June 30, 2025.
(2) The youth advisory group established in section 4 of this  2024 Act must first meet no
later than December 15, 2025.
SECTION 6.  Section 4 of this 2024 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  (1) A youth advisory group is established for the purposes of this section.
(2)(a) The Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction, in consultation with [ the work group
established by section 1 of this 2024 Act ] current members of the youth  advisory group , shall
select members of the youth advisory group as provided  by this subsection. The term of office of
each member is one year.
(b) The majority of the members of the youth advisory  group must be youth between the ages
of 14 and 18 years of age during their term of service on the youth advisory group. The youth
members of the youth advisory group must include two youth from  each education service district
identified in ORS 334.013.
(c) When selecting the members of the youth advisory group, the Deputy Superintendent  of
Public Instruction shall:
(A) Consult with the Youth Development Division, the Oregon Health Authority and  the Racial
Justice Council to select  members of the youth advisory group who are one or more of the following:
(i) Youth and staff representing tribal youth councils;
(ii) Youth and staff representing youth and student leadership organizations;
(iii) Youth and staff representing alternative education pathways;
(iv) Youth from immigrant and refugee communities;
(v) Individuals  representing culturally and ethnically specific community-based organizations,
including organizations that assist immigrant and refugee communities;
(vi) Individuals who are administrators, teachers and other school staff  who support youth and
student leadership in  public schools, including education service districts, school districts, schools
and youth reengagement programs;
(vii) Youth who serve as advisors to the State Board of  Education or serve on Department of
Education work groups related to student success initiatives;
(viii) Youth who serve on the Youth Development Council  or who participate in Youth Devel-
opment Division programs;
(ix) Youth who serve on Oregon Health Authority work groups;
(x) Youth who serve on Racial Justice Council work groups; and
(xi) Additional members identified and recommended by the youth advisory group.
(B) Consult with the Youth  Development Division to select members of the youth advisory group
who are youth who have been reengaged and to  select program staff who support the statewide
youth reengagement system developed and administered by the division under ORS 417.859 or who
otherwise provide education opportunities to youth or support the educational success of youth.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 5
(d) In addition to the members of the youth advisory group described  in paragraphs (b) and (c)
of this subsection, the youth advisory group may include any other  members identified and recom-
mended by the youth  advisory group and selected by the Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruc-
tion [ in consultation with the work group established by section 1 of this 2024 Act ].
(e) The Deputy  Superintendent of Public Instruction may provide for alternate members for the
youth members of the youth advisory group described in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(f)(A) When making selections under this subsection, the Deputy Superintendent of Public In-
struction must ensure that:
(i) At least 70 percent of the members of the youth  advisory group have lived experiences with,
or a  demonstrated understanding of, issues facing persons who are from racial or ethnic communi-
ties that historically have been, or currently are, underrepresented or underserved;
(ii) At least 50 percent of the  youth members of the youth advisory group from each of the re-
gions identified in  paragraph (b) of this subsection have lived experiences with, or a demonstrated
understanding of, issues facing persons who are from racial or ethnic  communities that historically
have been, or currently are, underrepresented or underserved; and
(iii) The youth members of the youth advisory group must include youth who:
(I) Have lived experiences with,  or a demonstrated understanding of, issues facing persons who
identify as lesbian, gay, bisexual,  transgender, queer, two-spirit, intersex, asexual, nonbinary or an-
other minority gender identity or sexual orientation;
(II) Are English language learners;
(III) Are identified as being a child with a disability, as defined in ORS 343.035;
(IV) Are navigating poverty;
(V) Are a foster child or have a parent involved in the criminal justice system; or
(VI) Have experienced disproportionate results in education due to historical practices, as
identified by the State Board of Education by rule.
(B) For the purpose of this paragraph, racial or ethnic  communities that historically have been,
or currently are, underrepresented or underserved include communities for which a  statewide edu-
cation plan has been developed and implemented.
(g) A member of the  youth advisory group may be selected for up to two terms. If there is a
vacancy for any cause, the Deputy Superintendent of Public  Instruction, in consultation with other
members of the youth advisory group, shall  make a selection to become immediately effective for the
unexpired term.
(3) The Department of Education shall ensure that each youth  member of the youth advisory
group:
(a) Receives sufficient  support to enable participation in youth advisory group meetings, in-
cluding:
(A) Reimbursement for actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred in  the per-
formance of official duties in the manner and amounts provided in ORS 292.495; and
(B) Funding for any expenses not otherwise reimbursed under subparagraph (A)  of this para-
graph; and
(b) Has resources available to reimburse any adult  who provides transportation or other sup-
ports in helping the youth member to participate in the youth advisory group.
(4) The youth advisory group, with  support from the Department of Education, shall take into
consideration racial equity  and justice and align with other statewide efforts for racial equity and
justice when performing the following duties:
(a) Developing the youth advisory group’s goals, success criteria and  progress measures related
to youth and student leadership and  engagement in the policymaking process in this state. When
performing the duties described in this paragraph, the youth advisory group may modify the youth
advisory group’s decision-making process, scope  of work, work plans and meeting structures, and the
roles and responsibilities of youth advisory group members.
(b) Examining current Department of Education, Youth Development Division  and Oregon
Health Authority initiatives and practices related to youth and  student leadership and engagement
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 6
in the policymaking process and making recommendations  on how to elevate and support youth and
student leadership and youth-led and student-led accountability in the  policymaking process at the
state and local level. When performing the duties described in this paragraph, the youth advisory
group must give careful consideration to youth and student leadership and to engagement by youth
described in subsection (2)(f)(A)(ii) and (iii) of this section. The youth  advisory group may recom-
mend methods for  evaluating current initiatives, practices and progress relating to youth and stu-
dent leadership and engagement at the state level.
(c) Connecting with youth and student leaders and exploring youth  and student leadership net-
works, including culturally and ethnically specific, community-based models and Youth Development
Division programs, to identify best practices in youth-led and student-led accountability in this  state
and on a national level.  Based  on  the performance of the duties described in this paragraph, the
youth advisory group shall make recommendations to the State Board of  Education, the Youth De-
velopment Council, the Legislative Assembly and the Governor  on how to support youth and student
leadership networks on a regional level for the purposes of connecting youths with  youth organiza-
tions, connecting students with student organizations, elevating youth  and student leadership and
voice and supporting youth-led and  student-led accountability, with special consideration given to
youth described in subsection (2)(f)(A)(ii) and (iii) of this section.
(d) Helping the Department of Education, the Youth  Development Division and the Oregon
Health Authority with the surveys that  are administered to youth and students by assisting with
reviews of the findings and making recommendations on the content and  administration of the sur-
veys.
(e) Evaluating current processes in this state to identify best practices  for youth and students
reporting a bias incident as defined in ORS 147.380 or a  hate or bias crime. Based on the perform-
ance of  the duty described in this paragraph, the youth advisory group shall make recommendations
for providing support to youth  and students who have experienced bias incidents or hate or bias
crimes.
(f) Reporting on the youth  advisory group’s work, progress and recommendations to the Legis-
lative Assembly and the Governor every two  years and providing interim updates to youth and
student leadership networks and organizations, education service districts, school districts and  local
entities that serve youth and students.
(5)(a) The youth advisory group shall meet at least  six times each year on the dates determined
by a majority of the members of the youth advisory group. The  youth advisory group shall also meet
at other times specified or requested by a majority of the members of the youth advisory group.
(b) The youth advisory group shall meet  in the place and manner determined by a majority of
the members of the youth advisory group. All or part of the members of the  youth advisory group
may attend the meetings electronically, unless otherwise provided by a  majority of the members of
the youth advisory group.
(6) The Department of Education shall:
(a) Provide staff support to the youth advisory group; and
(b) Support youth advisory group members in participating in the youth advisory group.
SECTION 7.
The amendments to section 4 of this 2024 Act by section 6 of this 2024 Act
become operative on August 30, 2025.
NOTE: Section 8 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
STUDENT INFORMATION
SECTION 9. (1) The Department of Education shall develop a plan for the collection of
course-level completion and grade data for all public school students in grades 6  through 12.
(2) No later than September 15, 2024, the Department of Education  shall submit a report
in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for  legislation,
to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education regarding:
(a) The plan developed under subsection (1) of this section; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 7
(b) The funding  the department will require during the 2025-2027 biennium for the pur-
poses of the plan.
SECTION 10. Section 9 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
DIRECT ADMISSIONS
SECTION 11.  ORS 350.075 is amended to read:
350.075. (1) As  used in this section, “student access programs” means scholarship, loan, grant
and access programs described in ORS chapter 348.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall be guided by the legislative findings
in ORS 341.009, 350.001 and 350.005 and the  goals and mission of post-secondary education set forth
in ORS 350.009 and 350.014.
(3) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall:
(a) Develop  state goals for the state post-secondary education system, including community col-
leges and public universities listed in ORS 352.002, and for student access programs.
(b) Determine strategic investments  in the state’s community colleges, public universities and
student access programs necessary to achieve state post-secondary education goals.
(c) Coordinate the post-secondary elements of data collection and structure, with the advice  and
recommendation of the state’s independent institutions, community  colleges and public universities,
as appropriate, in order to construct a state longitudinal data system.
(d) Adopt a strategic plan  for achieving state post-secondary education goals, taking into con-
sideration the contributions  of this state’s independent institutions, philanthropic organizations and
other organizations  dedicated to helping Oregonians reach state goals. State post-secondary educa-
tion goals as described in this section should include, but need not be limited to:
(A) Increasing the educational attainment of the population;
(B) Increasing this state’s global  economic competitiveness and the quality of life of its resi-
dents;
(C) Ensuring  affordable access for qualified Oregon students at each college or public university;
(D) Removing barriers to on-time completion; and
(E) Tracking progress toward meeting  the state’s post-secondary education goals established in
the strategic plan described in this paragraph.
(e)(A) Each biennium, after receiving funding requests from  the state’s community colleges and
public universities as authorized by law, recommend to the Governor  a consolidated higher educa-
tion agency request budget aligned with the strategic plan described in paragraph (d) of this  sub-
section, including appropriations for:
(i) Student access programs;
(ii) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002, including but not limited  to education and general
operations, statewide public services and state-funded debt service;
(iii) Community colleges, including but not limited to education and  general operations and
state-funded debt service;
(iv) New facilities or programs;
(v) Capital improvements and deferred maintenance;
(vi) Special initiatives and investments; and
(vii) Any other program, duty or function a public university listed in ORS 352.002 is authorized
to undertake.
(B) In the development of the consolidated higher education agency request budget:
(i) Determine the costs necessary to provide quality post-secondary education;
(ii) Solicit input from educators, education policy  experts, appropriate legislative committees,
students and other persons interested in the development of the funding model; and
(iii) Solicit public input regarding educational priorities.
(f) Adopt rules governing the distribution of appropriations from the  Legislative Assembly to
community colleges, public universities  listed in ORS 352.002 and student access programs. These
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 8
rules must be based on allocation formulas developed in consultation with the state’s  community
colleges and public universities, as appropriate.
(g) Approve or  disapprove any significant change to the academic program of a community col-
lege or a public university listed in ORS 352.002. In reaching a decision under this paragraph,  the
commission shall consider the  recommendation from the community college or public university
seeking to  make the change to an academic program that is issued pursuant to the obligation of the
governing board of a community college or public university to  review and approve academic pro-
grams. The commission shall ensure that approved programs:
(A) Are consistent with the mission statement of the community college or public university;
(B) Do not unnecessarily duplicate academic  programs offered by Oregon’s other community
colleges or public universities;
(C) Are not located in a geographic area  that will cause undue hardship to Oregon’s other
community colleges or public universities; and
(D) Are allocated among Oregon’s community colleges and  public universities to maximize the
achievement of statewide needs and requirements.
(h) For public universities listed in ORS 352.002:
(A) Approve the mission statement adopted by a governing board of a public university.
(B) Review and determine whether a proposed annual increase  of resident undergraduate en-
rollment fees of greater than five percent is appropriate.
(C) Advise the Governor and the Legislative Assembly on issues of university governance.
(D) Approve and authorize degrees.
(E) Perform the evaluation and certification required by ORS 350.095.
(i) Authorize degrees to be offered by independent  post-secondary institutions in this state under
ORS 348.594 to 348.615.
(j) Oversee the licensing of career schools under ORS 345.010 to 345.340.
(k) Have the  authority to enter into and administer interstate agreements regarding the pro-
vision of post-secondary distance education. The participation by an educational institution  that is
not based in this state in distance learning courses or programs that are part of  an interstate
agreement entered into and administered under this paragraph  does not constitute operating in this
state for  purposes of ORS 348.594 to 348.615. The commission, by rule, may impose a fee on any
educational institution that seeks to operate under or  participate in such interstate agreements. The
fee amount shall be established to recover designated expenses incurred by the  commission in par-
ticipating in such agreements.
(L) Administer a statewide longitudinal data system.
(m) In coordination with the Department of Education,  the Employment Department and other
state agencies, conduct statewide  longitudinal studies and reporting of early learning, kindergarten
through grade 12 education, higher education and workforce programs. For the purposes  of this
paragraph:
(A) The commission shall enter into written interagency agreements with the  Department of
Education, the Employment Department and any other state agencies necessary for  conducting
statewide longitudinal studies and reporting.
(B) The  commission may share data from the statewide longitudinal data system with persons
or public bodies. For  purposes of this subparagraph, the commission shall adopt rules to establish
procedures for requesting or sharing data and may enter into written agreements for sharing data.
(C) The commission is  considered an authorized representative of state educational agencies
under applicable state  and federal law for purposes of accessing, compiling and storing student data
for research, audit and evaluation purposes.
(n) Establish a direct admissions program for  community colleges in this state and public
universities listed in ORS 352.002. The commission shall adopt rules to:
(A) Establish  a method for the collection of student data necessary to implement the
program, which may include collaborating with the Department of Education to the  extent
necessary to collect the student data; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 9
(B) Maximize opportunities  for underserved students and first generation college stu-
dents to participate in the program.
(4)(a) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall  implement a process to review and
appropriately act on student complaints regarding any school  operating in this state. As part of the
process implemented under this subsection, the commission may:
(A) Receive student complaints from students regarding a school;
(B) Specify the type of information that must be included in a student complaint;
(C) Investigate and resolve student complaints that relate to state financial aid;
(D) Refer a  student complaint to another entity for investigation and resolution as provided in
paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(E) Adopt rules to implement the provisions of this subsection; and
(F) Enter into agreements to implement the provisions of this subsection.
(b) The commission may refer the investigation and resolution of a student complaint to:
(A) An appropriate state agency if  the complaint alleges that a school has violated a state law
concerning consumer protection, civil rights, employment rights or environmental quality;
(B) A school’s accrediting association if the complaint relates to the school’s authorization to
offer academic degree programs or to the quality of the school’s academic degree programs; or
(C) The school at  which the student is enrolled if the commission determines that the complaint
should be resolved through the school’s internal review process.
(c) As used in this subsection:
(A)(i) “School” means an independent institution of higher education that meets the require-
ments of ORS 348.597 (2)(a).
(ii) “School”  does not mean a school that is exempt from ORS 348.594 to 348.615 under ORS
348.597 (2)(b) or (c).
(B) “Student” means a person  who is enrolled at a school for the purpose of obtaining a degree,
certificate or other recognized educational credential offered by that school.
(5) A student complaint that  is received by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, in-
cluding but not limited to a student complaint filed  under subsection (4) of this section, is not sub-
ject to disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(6) In addition to the duties described in subsections (2) to (4) of this section, the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission  shall advise the Legislative Assembly, the Governor, community
colleges, public universities and other state boards and commissions on policies in order to:
(a) Ensure or improve access to higher education by diverse and underserved populations.
(b) Encourage student success and completion initiatives.
(c) Improve the coordination of the provision of educational services, including:
(A) Transfers and coenrollment throughout the higher education system;
(B) Accelerated college credit programs for high school students;
(C) Applied baccalaureate and other transfer degrees;
(D) Programs and grants that span multiple institutions; and
(E) Reciprocity agreements with other states.
(d) In coordination with the State  Board of Education, enhance the use and quality of dual
credit, career and technical pathways and efforts to create a  culture of college attendance in this
state.
(e) In coordination with the State Workforce and Talent  Development Board, local workforce
development  boards,  the Oregon Health and Science University and independent institutions, ensure
that the state’s colleges and universities offer programs  in high-demand occupations that meet
Oregon’s workforce needs.
(f) Improve economies of scale by encouraging and facilitating the  use of the shared services
among post-secondary institutions in this state.
(7) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission, in  a manner consistent with ORS chapter
183, may adopt administrative rules.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 10
(8) With the exception of the rulemaking authority granted in subsection (7) of  this section, the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission may  delegate any of its powers, duties or functions to
a committee of the commission or to the executive director of the commission.
(9) The Higher  Education Coordinating Commission may, subject to the Public Contracting
Code, enter into contracts and agreements, including grant agreements, with public and  private en-
tities for those higher  education and workforce development activities that are consistent with ORS
350.001 and 350.005, with the policies set forth in ORS  chapters 341 and 348 and with statutory
policies related to career schools and public universities.
(10)(a) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may exercise only powers,  duties and
functions expressly granted by the Legislative  Assembly. Except as otherwise expressly provided by
law, all other authorities reside  at the institutional level with the respective boards of the post-
secondary institutions.
(b) The commission has implied  and direct authority to implement the powers, duties and func-
tions expressly granted to the commission by the Legislative Assembly.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph  (b) of this subsection, the commission may not exercise any au-
thority, express or implied, statutorily provided to a governing board of a public  university listed
in ORS 352.002 or a community college operated under ORS chapter 341.
STATE FUNDING OF EDUCATION
SECTION 12. (1) The Legislative Policy and Research Director shall conduct a study of:
(a) The Quality Education Model; and
(b) The state’s system  of financing public education from kindergarten through grade 12.
(2) The study conducted under this section must include at least:
(a) A review of the education  funding formula for public education for kindergarten
through grade 12 in this state and  an exploration of options that would provide a uniform
and equitable  design for financing the cost of an adequate education for all public school
students in kindergarten through grade 12 in this state.
(b) A review and evaluation of the Quality Education Model, including the processes used
to:
(A) Determine the best practices included in the model;
(B) Estimate school district operating expenses for purposes of the model;
(C) Select quality indicators for the model; and
(D) Accurately calculate the cost of a quality education for all students of this state.
(c) The identification of trends and disparities since the 2019-2020  school year in student
performance across the state in kindergarten through grade 12 based on  current school
funding.
(d) The establishment of the baseline for the  costs, programs, staffing and facilities
needed to provide the opportunity for an adequate education.
(e) A review of the costs and existing funding for special education and  related services
and an exploration of possible alternative funding formulas.
(3) For the  purpose of conducting the study described in this section, the director may
enter into a contract with a public, private  or nonprofit research entity. When entering into
a contract, the director shall give preference, to the greatest extent practicable,  to a re-
search entity that has conducted similar studies in other states.
(4) All agencies  of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist the
director, and any entity working  under contract with the director, in conducting the study
and, to the extent permitted by laws related to confidentiality, to  furnish information and
advice necessary for the director or contractor to complete the study.
(5) The director shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the in-
terim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to education no later than January 31,
2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 11
SECTION 13. Section 12 of this 2024 Act is repealed on June 30, 2025.
SECTION 14.  ORS 171.857 is amended to read:
171.857. (1) For each odd-numbered year  regular session of the Legislative Assembly, the Presi-
dent of  the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall jointly appoint a special
legislative committee to issue a report pursuant to  section 8, Article VIII of the Oregon Constitu-
tion.
(2) The committee may not transact business unless a  quorum is present. A quorum consists of
a majority of committee members from the House of Representatives and a majority of committee
members from the Senate.
(3) Action by the committee requires the affirmative  vote of a majority of committee members
from the House of Representatives and a majority of committee members from the Senate.
[(4) Members of the committee are entitled to compensation and expense  reimbursement as provided
in ORS 171.072. ]
[(5) The Legislative Assembly in the report shall: ]
(4) In the report, the Legislative Assembly shall accomplish one of the following:
(a) Demonstrate that the amount within the budget appropriated for the state’s system of
kindergarten through grade 12 public education is the amount of  moneys , as determined by the
Quality Education Commission established by ORS 327.500 , that is sufficient  to meet the quality
goals[ ; or].
(b) Identify the reasons that the amount appropriated for the  state’s system of kindergarten
through grade 12 public education is not sufficient, the extent of the insufficiency  and the impact
of the insufficiency on the ability of the state’s system  of kindergarten through grade 12 public ed-
ucation to meet the quality  goals. In identifying the impact of the insufficiency, the Legislative As-
sembly shall include in the report how the amount appropriated in the budget may affect both the
current practices and  student performance identified by the commission under ORS 327.506 (4)(a)
and the best practices  and student performance identified by the commission under ORS 327.506
(4)(b).
[(6)(a)] (5)(a) Notwithstanding subsection [ (5)] (4) of this section, the [ Legislative Assembly ]
committee may make a determination that the report of the Quality Education Commission should
not be used as the basis for carrying out the reporting requirements of section 8, Article VIII  of the
Oregon Constitution, and subsection [ (5)] (4) of this  section. If the report is not used, the [ Legislative
Assembly ] committee shall identify the reasons for not using the report to  meet the reporting re-
quirements and shall outline an alternative methodology for making the findings required by  section
8, Article VIII of the Oregon Constitution.
(b) The alternative methodology shall be based on:
(A) Research, data and public values; and
(B) The performance of successful schools, professional judgment or a combination of the per-
formance of successful schools and professional judgment.
(c) The Legislative Assembly shall include in the report that uses the  alternative methodology
a determination of how the amount appropriated may affect the ability of  the state’s system of
kindergarten through grade 12 public education to meet quality  goals established by law, including
expected student performance against those goals.
[(7)] (6) The Legislative Assembly shall identify in the  report whether the state’s system of
post-secondary public education has quality goals established by law. If there are quality goals, the
Legislative Assembly shall include in the report a determination  that the amount appropriated in
the budget is sufficient  to meet those goals or an identification of the reasons the amount appro-
priated is not  sufficient, the extent of the insufficiency and the impact of the insufficiency on the
ability of the state’s system of post-secondary public education to meet those quality goals.
[(8)] (7) The report shall be issued within  180 days after the Legislative Assembly adjourns sine
die.
[(9)] (8) The Legislative Assembly shall provide public notice of the report’s  issuance, including
posting the report on the Internet and providing a print version of the report upon request.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 12
FINANCIAL AID DISTRIBUTIONS
SECTION 15.  ORS 348.205 is amended to read:
348.205. (1) The  Oregon Opportunity Grant program is established within the Higher Education
Coordinating Commission.
(2) Under the program, the cost of education of a qualified student shall be shared by the  stu-
dent, the family of the student, the federal government and the state.
(3) The [ Director of  the Office of Student Access and Completion ] commission shall determine the
cost of education of a qualified student based on the type of eligible post-secondary  institution the
student is attending. The cost of education equals:
(a) For a student attending a community college, the  average cost of education of attending a
community college in this state;
(b) For a student attending a public university  listed in ORS 352.002, the average cost of edu-
cation of attending a public university;
(c) For a student attending a two-year Oregon-based, generally  accredited, not-for-profit institu-
tion of higher education,  the average cost of education of attending a community college in this
state; and
(d) For a student attending the Oregon Health and Science University or a  four-year Oregon-
based, generally accredited, not-for-profit institution of higher education,  the average cost of edu-
cation of attending a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(4)(a) The  [ director] commission shall determine the amount of the student share. The student
share shall be based on:
(A) The type of eligible post-secondary institution the student is attending;
(B) The number of hours of work that the [ director] commission  determines  may be reasonably
expected from the student; and
(C) The amount of loans that the [ director] commission determines would  constitute a man-
ageable debt burden for the student.
(b) The student shall determine how to cover the  student share through income from work,
loans, savings and scholarships.
(c) The student  share for a student who attends a community college may not exceed the amount
that the [ director] commission determines a student may earn  based on the number of hours of
work reasonably expected from the student under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(d) The student share for a student who attends an eligible  post-secondary institution that is not
a community college may not exceed the sum of the amount that the [ director] commission deter-
mines a student may receive as loans plus the amount a  student may earn based on the number of
hours of work reasonably expected from the student under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(5) The [ director] commission shall determine the amount  of the family share. The family share
shall be based on the resources of the family.
(6) The [ director] commission shall  determine the amount of the federal share based on how
much the student or the student’s family is expected to receive from the federal government.
(7)(a) The  [ director] commission shall determine the amount of the state share  by rule . The
state share shall be equal to the cost of education reduced by the student share, family share  and
amount received by the student from the federal government.
(b) The [ director] commission shall establish a minimum amount that a student may receive as
a state share. If the [ director] commission determines that the amount of  the state share of a stu-
dent is below the minimum amount, the student may not receive the state share.
(c) The [ director] commission may not reduce the amount of the  state share of a student based
on amounts available to the student by virtue of  being the designated beneficiary of a college
savings network account established under ORS 178.300 to 178.360.
(8) Subject to subsection (9) of this section, if the [ director] commission determines that there
are insufficient moneys to award the state share to all qualified students,  the [ director]
commission:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 13
(a) May  establish the maximum amount that a student may receive as a state share. This amount
may vary based on whether the student is attending an eligible post-secondary  institution on a
half-time or full-time basis.
(b) May establish procedures that  prioritize awarding Oregon Opportunity Grants to qualified
students with the greatest financial need or whose circumstances would  enhance the promotion of
equity guidelines published by the [ Higher Education Coordinating ] commission.
(c) May not reduce the amount of the state share awarded to students in the  low income range
in a greater proportion than the amount that the state share for students in  other income ranges
is reduced.
[(9)(a) The Higher Education Coordinating commission shall adopt rules that prioritize  current
foster children and former foster children for receiving  Oregon Opportunity Grants when the Oregon
Opportunity Grant program does not have sufficient funding to serve all eligible Oregon students. ]
[(b) For the purposes  of this subsection, “former foster child” has the meaning given that term in
ORS 350.300.]
(9) The commission shall adopt rules that  implement the Oregon Opportunity Grant
program. The rules adopted by the commission shall:
(a) Specify the manner by which the commission determines the state share.
(b) Prioritize current foster children and former foster children for receiving Oregon
Opportunity Grants when the Oregon Opportunity Grant program  does not have sufficient
funding to serve all eligible Oregon students. As used in this paragraph, “former foster
child” has the meaning given that term in ORS 350.300.
SECTION 15a.
The amendments to ORS 348.205  by section 15 of this 2024 Act first apply
to state shares determined for the 2025-2026 academic year.
SECTION 16.  ORS 348.250 is amended to read:
348.250. (1) Grants established under ORS 348.260 shall be awarded by the Higher  Education
Coordinating Commission in the manner provided in this section.
(2) Persons interested in obtaining  a grant established under ORS 348.260 may apply to the
[Director of the Office of Student Access and Completion ] commission for a grant.
(3) The [ director] commission shall screen or cause to be screened the applications and shall
determine for each available grant the person best qualified to receive that grant.  A qualified ap-
plicant is eligible to receive a grant established under ORS 348.260 if:
(a) The applicant’s financial need is such that in  the opinion of the [ director] commission fi-
nancial aid is warranted; and
(b) The applicant plans to be a student at  the eligible post-secondary institution where the grant
is to be used.
(4) The [ director] commission shall not discriminate for or against any applicant for a grant.
(5) Nothing in this section or  ORS 348.260, 348.505 to 348.615, 348.696 or 348.992 shall be con-
strued to require any institution to admit a grant recipient or to attempt to control or influence the
policies of the institution.
(6) Whenever funds are not available to award grants  to all qualified students, the [ director]
commission may give priority to applicants who are or plan to be full-time students  at the eligible
post-secondary institution where the grant  is to be used. A student shall be considered to be a
full-time student if  the combination of credit hours at more than one eligible post-secondary insti-
tution equals full-time attendance, according to the institution disbursing the grant funds.
(7) As used in  this section, “discriminate” has the meaning given “discrimination” in ORS
659.850.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 348.260 is amended to read:
348.260. (1) In addition to any other form of student financial aid  authorized by law, the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission may award Oregon Opportunity Grants to qualified students.
(2) The amount of a grant shall equal  the state share of a qualified student’s cost of education
as determined by the [ Director of  the Office of Student Access and Completion ] commission  and
comply with applicable rules and procedures described in ORS 348.205.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 14
(3) Grant funds necessary to meet matching requirements for federal funds may also be used  to
award grants to qualified students in any eligible post-secondary institution approved by the  com-
mission.
(4) Grants may be awarded under this section to  qualified students enrolled for any term, in-
cluding summer term. The commission may prescribe the method and date or dates by  which a stu-
dent must apply to the commission to qualify for a grant.
(5)(a) A qualified student  who receives a grant under this section may apply for renewal of the
grant on an annual basis. The commission may not renew the grant if the qualified student has  not
made a timely application for renewal of the grant.
(b) The commission shall by rule establish academic standards and benchmarks  that a qualified
student must meet to have the student’s grant renewed.
(c) If a qualified student who receives a grant  under this section makes a timely application for
renewal of  the grant, meets the academic standards and benchmarks established by the commission
under this subsection and continues to meet all other grant eligibility criteria, the grant  shall be
renewed for a second year of attendance at an eligible post-secondary institution.
(d) Upon timely application by a qualified student who meets the  academic standards and
benchmarks established by the commission under this subsection and who  continues to meet all
other grant eligibility criteria, the commission may continue to renew the  grant until the qualified
student has received the  equivalent of four full-time undergraduate years of grant funding for an
eligible program as defined by the commission.
(6)(a) The [ Director of the Office of Student Access and Completion ] commission shall inform el-
igible post-secondary institutions of the identity of  qualified students who attend the institution and
who receive a grant under this section for more than one academic year.
(b) To the extent possible, eligible post-secondary  institutions shall ensure that qualified stu-
dents identified under this subsection are made aware of the  academic guidance and counseling
services available at the institution.
(7) A qualified student who receives a grant under  this section must attend the eligible post-
secondary institution upon which the grant application is based unless the [ Director of the  Office of
Student Access and Completion ] commission authorizes the grant to be used at a  different eligible
post-secondary institution. A qualified student who receives a grant under  this section may attend
more than one eligible post-secondary institution  if the grant application was based on the qualified
student attending more than one eligible post-secondary institution.
(8) The  commission may not make a grant award to any qualified student enrolled in a course
of study required for and leading to a degree in theology, divinity or religious education.
(9)(a) The  commission shall report annually on or before February 1 to committees of the Leg-
islative Assembly related to higher  education regarding the academic success and performance of
qualified students who receive grants under this section.
(b) In order to meet the reporting requirements set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) The commission shall by rule design  a method for evaluating the academic success and
performance of students who receive a grant under this section; and
(B) Upon a  request from the commission, eligible post-secondary institutions must provide the
commission with the data necessary for the commission to conduct its analysis.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 348.263 is amended to read:
348.263. (1) In addition to any other form of student financial aid  authorized by law, the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission may award moneys from  the Oregon Opportunity Grant pro-
gram to qualified students to reward student persistence and encourage completion  of degree pro-
grams at eligible post-secondary institutions.
(2) Awards made under this section are not subject to the maximum Oregon Opportunity Grant
amount established under ORS 348.205.
(3) The commission shall establish  by rule eligibility criteria for awards made under this section.
These criteria shall include, but not be limited to, whether the qualified  student is attending an el-
igible post-secondary institution on a full-time or half-time basis.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 15
(4)(a) The [ Director of the Office of  Student Access and Completion ] commission shall administer,
and determine the size of, awards made under this section.
(b) In determining the size of awards made under this section, the [ director] commission shall
consider basing the size of the awards on a percentage of  the maximum Oregon Opportunity Grant
amount established under ORS 348.205.
SECTION 19.  ORS 348.520 is amended to read:
348.520. The [ Director of the Office  of Student Access and Completion ] Higher Education Coor-
dinating Commission shall:
(1) Make available to qualified persons financial aid from financial sources available to  the [ di-
rector] commission .
(2) Determine qualifications of persons to receive financial aid.
(3) Maintain reports and records on persons applying for and receiving financial aid from the
[director] commission.
(4) Withhold any financial aid if the recipient thereof fails to maintain the standards  established
for receipt of that aid.
(5) Recommend to the Legislative Assembly not less than once every biennium matters  relating
to the establishment, administration, modification, transfer, reduction or cancellation of  financial
aid.
[(6) Prior to implementing changes to the Oregon Opportunity Grant program, report to the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission and  the Legislative Assembly or the Emergency Board any pro-
posed change:]
[(a) That increases or  decreases the total amount awarded as Oregon Opportunity Grants that was
approved as part of the budget enacted by the Legislative Assembly  for the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission; and ]
[(b) To the methodology used to determine the student share, family share or state share  under
ORS 348.205.]
[(7)] (6) Encourage the establishment of financial aid programs by private agencies.
[(8)] (7) Collect and disseminate information pertaining to all types of available financial aid.
[(9)] (8) Review the administrative practices and evaluate the effectiveness of all public and
private post-secondary financial aid programs in Oregon.
[(10)] (9) Disburse state appropriations for  financial aid in such a manner as to maximize its role
in cooperative coordination of financial aid programs.
FUNDING FOR YOUTH EDUCATION PROGRAMS
SECTION 20.
 ORS 326.695 is amended to read:
326.695. (1) As used in [ ORS 326.700 and 326.712 ] this section :
[(1)] (a) “Juvenile Detention Education Program”  means the provision of educational services
to:
[(a)] (A) Youths placed  in a youth care center, as defined in ORS 420.855, that is within a de-
tention facility, as defined in ORS 419A.004; and
[(b)] (B) Youths lodged overnight who receive educational services on consecutive days within
a detention facility, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
[(2)] (b) “Youth Corrections Education  Program” means the provision of educational services to
youths in youth correction facilities, as defined in ORS 420.005.
(2) The Department of Education shall administer the Youth Corrections  Education
Program and the Juvenile Detention Education Program in a manner that provides youths
in those programs with a quality education.
(3)(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction may contract  with an education service
district or a school district to provide  teachers, counselors or other personnel for the Youth
Corrections Education Program and the Juvenile Detention Education Program.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 16
(b) When a contract is entered into with  an education service district, the Youth Cor-
rections Education Program and the Juvenile Detention Education Program  are not consid-
ered a component district of the education service district and the youths  enrolled in the
programs may not be counted when determining the number of pupils in average daily
membership for purposes of ORS 334.175 (5).
(4) When determining the amount to be paid under a  contract entered into as provided
by subsection (3) of this section, the following shall be taken into consideration:
(a) The number of youths to be provided educational services;
(b) The characteristics of the facility where the educational services will  be provided,
including the number of classrooms required to provide educational services;
(c) The diversity of the population of youths to  be provided educational services, includ-
ing the  number and percentage of youths who are from historically underserved populations;
(d) The number and percentage of youths to be provided educational services who qualify
for special education and related services; and
(e) The level of transition supports provided to the youths.
(5) The Department  of Education shall use moneys in the Juvenile Justice Education
Fund established under section 22  of this 2024 Act for the purpose of paying contracts en-
tered into under this section.
(6) The State Board of Education shall adopt  rules necessary for the administration of
this section,  including establishing a process by which an education service district or a
school district may appeal the amount received under a contract entered  into under this
section. When adopting the rules, the board shall consult with:
(a) The Oregon Youth Authority;
(b) School districts and education service  districts under contract with the Department
of Education to provide educational services to students enrolled in the  Youth Corrections
Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program; and
(c) County juvenile departments.
SECTION 21.
Sections 22 and 23 of this 2024 Act are added to and made a part of  ORS
chapter 327.
SECTION 22. (1) The Juvenile Justice Education Fund is established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the Juvenile Justice
Education Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Juvenile  Justice Education Fund are continuously appropriated to the
Department of  Education for distribution to the Youth Corrections Education Program and
the Juvenile Detention Education Program, as those terms  are defined in ORS 326.695, to
provide educational services to youths in those  programs under contracts entered into as
provided by ORS 326.695.
(3) The Juvenile Justice Education Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys allocated from the State School  Fund for students enrolled in the Youth
Corrections Education Program and the Juvenile Detention Education Program under  ORS
327.026;
(b) Moneys made available for the Youth Corrections Education  Program and the Juve-
nile Detention Education Program from the Statewide Education Initiatives  Account under
ORS 327.254;
(c) Moneys  appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assem-
bly; and
(d) Other amounts deposited into the Juvenile Justice Education Fund from any source.
SECTION 23.
(1) Each even-numbered year, the Department of Education shall  prepare
a target funding level for the  Juvenile Justice Education Fund for the following biennium.
Moneys in the Juvenile Justice Education Fund shall be distributed as provided by  ORS
326.695 to the Youth  Corrections Education Program and the Juvenile Detention Education
Program, as those terms are defined in ORS 326.695.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 17
(2)(a) The target funding level of  the Juvenile Justice Education Fund shall be calculated
by multiplying:
(A) The average funding level per  classroom, as calculated based on all classrooms op-
erated under the Youth Corrections Education Program  and the Juvenile Detention Educa-
tion Program; and
(B) The total number of classrooms the Department  of Education expects to be operated
under the Youth Corrections Education Program and the Juvenile Detention  Education
Program for the following biennium.
(b) For  the purpose of determining the average funding level per classroom under para-
graph (a) of this subsection, the department shall:
(A) Determine the average funding  level per classroom for the 2024-2025 school year; and
(B) Adjust the amount determined under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph based  on
the same percentage by  which the amount appropriated to the State School Fund increased
for the  biennium in which the calculation is being made as compared with the amount ap-
propriated for the 2021-2023 biennium.
(3) The department shall estimate the expected difference  between the target funding
level calculated under  subsection (2) of this section and the amount anticipated to be made
available to  the Juvenile Justice Education Fund under section 22 (3)(a) and (d) of this 2024
Act. If, after all funding available under section  22 (3)(a), (c) and (d) of this 2024 Act has been
accounted for, the department determines that the amount  required for the target funding
level for  the fund has not been met, the department may transfer from the Statewide Edu-
cation Initiatives Account to the fund any needed amounts.
(4) If, at any time during the biennium,  the amount available in the Juvenile Justice
Education Fund and from other sources is not sufficient to pay for costs  incurred in relation
to the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education  Program,
the department shall  inform the Legislative Assembly or the Emergency Board of the lack
of funding and shall provide an accounting of the amount needed to pay those costs.
(5) No later than August 31 of each even-numbered  year, the department shall submit to
the Legislative Assembly and the Office of the Governor a report that  explains the target
funding level calculated under this section. When  applicable, the report shall include any
determinations by the department that the amounts available  for the Youth Corrections
Education Program  and the Juvenile Detention Education Program will not be adequate to
pay the costs of the programs.
SECTION 24.  ORS 327.026 is amended to read:
327.026. [(1) In order to accomplish the purpose described in ORS 326.700,  the State Board of
Education shall adopt by rule definitions and procedures to be applied to the computation of the State
School Fund allocations where necessary to make students  enrolled in the Youth Corrections Education
Program, as defined in ORS  326.695, and the Juvenile Detention Education Program, as defined in
ORS 326.695, equivalent to students enrolled in common and union high school districts for  purposes
of distribution of the fund. ]
(1) The State Board of  Education shall adopt by rule definitions and procedures to be
applied to the computation  of State School Fund allocations for students enrolled in the
Youth Corrections  Education Program and the Juvenile Detention Education Program, as
those terms are defined in ORS  326.695. The computations shall be equivalent to students
enrolled in common and union high school districts.
(2)(a) The Youth Corrections Education Program  shall receive from the State School Fund for
each school year a special State School Fund grant, consisting of a general purpose  grant that is
equal to the Youth Corrections Education Program  extended ADMw multiplied by Funding Per-
centage and further multiplied by Statewide Target per ADMw Grant.  For the purpose of the cal-
culation made under this paragraph:
(A) ADMw equals ADM multiplied by 2.0 multiplied by the additional per student weight, as
calculated in ORS 327.013 (1)(c)(A)(i).
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 18
(B) Extended ADMw equals ADMw or ADMw of the prior year, whichever is greater.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the  Youth Corrections Education Program
may not receive moneys under this section from the  State School Fund for any youth in the program
who:
(A) Has received a high school diploma; or
(B) Is 21 years of age or older.
(3) The Juvenile Detention Education Program shall receive from the State School Fund for each
school year a  special State School Fund grant, consisting of a general purpose grant that is equal
to the Juvenile Detention Education Program extended ADMw multiplied by  Funding Percentage
and further multiplied by Statewide Target per ADMw Grant. For the purpose  of the calculation
made under this subsection:
(a) ADMw equals ADM multiplied by 1.5.
(b) Extended ADMw equals ADMw or ADMw of the prior year, whichever is greater.
(4) Funds allocated to the Youth Corrections Education Program  and the Juvenile Detention
Education Program from the State  School Fund shall [ remain with the Department of Education
and] be deposited in the Juvenile Justice Education  Fund. The amount of funds to be allo-
cated shall  be adjusted in the year following the distribution to reflect the actual ADMw of students
in the Youth Corrections Education Program and the Juvenile Detention Education Program  in the
same manner as for the school districts under ORS 327.101.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 327.254 is amended to read:
327.254. (1) The Department of Education shall  use moneys in the Statewide Education Initi-
atives Account to provide funding for statewide education initiatives, including:
(a) Funding  the High School Graduation and College and Career Readiness Act at the levels
prescribed by ORS 327.856;
(b) Expanding school breakfast and lunch programs;
(c) Operating youth reengagement programs or providing youth reengagement services;
(d) Establishing and  maintaining the Statewide School Safety and Prevention System under ORS
339.341;
(e) Developing and  providing statewide equity initiatives, including any statewide education plan
developed and implemented by the department;
(f) Providing summer learning programs at  schools that are considered high poverty under Title
I of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965;
(g) Funding early warning systems to  assist students in graduating from high school, as de-
scribed in ORS 327.367;
(h) Developing and implementing professional  development programs and training programs, in-
cluding programs that increase educator diversity and retain diverse educators;
(i) Planning for increased transparency and accountability in the  public education system of this
state;
(j) Providing additional funding to  school districts participating in the intensive program under
ORS 327.222;
(k) Providing technical assistance, including costs incurred for:
(A) The coaching program described in ORS 327.214; and
(B) The intensive program described in ORS 327.222, including costs for student success teams;
(L) Funding public charter schools, as described in ORS 327.362;
(m) Funding the Early Literacy Success School Grant program, as provided by ORS 327.833;
(n) Funding the Early Literacy Success Community  Grant program, as established by ORS
327.843;
(o) Funding  any additional amounts for approved recovery schools, as provided by rules of the
State Board of Education adopted under ORS 327.029;
(p) Funding education service districts, as described in subsection (2) of this section; [ and]
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 19
(q) Funding the Youth Corrections Education Program and the Juvenile Detention  Edu-
cation Program  through the Juvenile Justice Education Fund established under section 22
of this 2024 Act, when necessary as provided by section 23 of this 2024 Act; and
[(q)] (r) Funding costs incurred by the department in implementing this section  and ORS 327.175
to 327.235 and 327.274.
(2)(a) The amount of a distribution to  an education service district under this section shall be
made as provided by paragraph (b)  of this subsection after calculating the following for each edu-
cation service district:
(A) One percent of  the total amount available for distribution to education service districts in
each biennium.
(B) The education service district’s ADMw ×  (the total  amount available for distribution to
education  service  districts in each biennium ÷  the total ADMw of all education service districts
that receive a distribution).
(b) The amount  of the distribution to an education service district shall be the greater of the
amounts calculated  under paragraph (a) of this subsection, except that, for distributions made as
provided by paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, the total  amount available for distribution to edu-
cation service districts shall  be the amount remaining after any distributions required under para-
graph (a)(A) of this subsection have been made.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, ADMw equals the ADMw as calculated under ORS  327.013,
except that the additional  amount allowed for students who are in poverty families, as determined
under ORS 327.013 (1)(c)(A)(v)(I), shall be 0.5.
(d) An education service district shall use moneys received under this section as  provided by a
plan developed by the school districts located within the  education service district. A school district
that declines to participate in the development of the plan or that has withdrawn from an  education
service district as provided by ORS 334.015 is not entitled to any  moneys distributed to the educa-
tion service district under this subsection.
(e) A plan developed under this subsection must:
(A) Align with and support the meeting of performance growth targets established for  recipients
of moneys under ORS 327.195 that are located within the education service district;
(B) Include the provision, to recipients of moneys under ORS 327.195 that  are located within the
education service district, of technical assistance in developing, implementing and reviewing a plan
for receiving a grant from the Student Investment Account;
(C) Provide for coordination with the department in administering and providing technical  as-
sistance to recipients  of moneys under ORS 327.195 that are located within the education service
district, including coordinating any coaching programs established under ORS 327.214; and
(D) Be adopted and amended as provided for local service plans under ORS 334.175 and approved
by the department.
(f) For the purposes of paragraph  (e) of this subsection, recipients of moneys under ORS 327.195
that are located within the education service district include, as applicable:
(A) Common school districts and union high school districts;
(B) Any charter school that is an eligible applicant, as defined in ORS 327.185; and
(C) The Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program.
(g) Each education service district must submit an annual report to the department that:
(A) Describes how the  education service district spent moneys received under this subsection;
and
(B) Includes an evaluation of the education service district’s compliance with the  plan from the
superintendent of each school district that participated in the development of the plan.
(3) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules necessary for the distribution of moneys un-
der this section.
SECTION 26.
ORS 326.700 and 326.712 are repealed.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 20
SECTION 27. The amendments to ORS  326.695, 327.026 and 327.254 by sections 20, 24 and
25 of this 2024 Act and the repeal of  ORS 326.700 and 326.712 by section 26 of this 2024 Act
become operative on July 1, 2024.
OREGON’S OPEN EDUCATIONAL RESOURCES PROGRAM
SECTION 28.  ORS 348.752 is amended to read:
348.752. (1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall regularly convene faculty,
staff and librarians from public universities listed in ORS 352.002 and community colleges  for the
purpose of coordinating Oregon’s Open Educational Resources (OER) Program by:
(a) Assisting and advising faculty at public universities and  community colleges on the adoption,
implementation and storage of open educational resource materials that are  transferable between
public universities and community colleges;
(b) Determining whether to develop  a statewide repository of open educational resource mate-
rials for the  purpose of supporting the program and, if applicable, developing a plan for the devel-
opment of the repository; and
(c) Developing criteria that  may be used to provide up to $150,000 to public universities and
community colleges for the purpose of increasing the creation, adoption or implementation  of open
educational resources.
(2) The commission may enter into contracts or  agreements with public or private entities for
the purpose of fulfilling its obligations under [ this section ] ORS 348.748 to 348.757 .
SHORT-ACTING OPIOID ANTAGONIST SCHOOL POLICIES
SECTION 29.  ORS 339.869 is amended to read:
339.869. (1) The State Board of Education,  in consultation with the Oregon Health Authority,
the Oregon State Board of Nursing and the State Board of Pharmacy, shall adopt:
(a) Rules for the administration of prescription and nonprescription medication to students by
trained school personnel and for student self-medication. The rules  shall include age appropriate
guidelines and training requirements for school personnel.
(b) Rules for the administration of  premeasured doses of epinephrine by school personnel trained
as provided by ORS 433.815 to any student  or other individual on school premises who the personnel
believe in good faith is experiencing a severe allergic reaction, regardless of whether the student
or individual has a prescription for epinephrine.
(c)(A) Rules for the administration of medication that treats adrenal insufficiency  by school
personnel trained as provided  by ORS 433.815 to any student on school premises whose parent or
guardian has provided for the personnel the medication as described in ORS 433.825 (3)  and who the
personnel believe in good faith is experiencing an adrenal crisis, as defined in ORS 433.800.
(B) Rules adopted under this paragraph must:
(i) Include guidelines on the designation and  training of school personnel who will be responsi-
ble for administering medication; and
(ii) Specify that a school district is only  required to train school personnel when the school
district has been notified by a parent or  guardian that a student enrolled in a school of the school
district has been diagnosed with adrenal insufficiency.
(d) Guidelines for the management of students with life-threatening food allergies and  adrenal
insufficiency, which must include:
(A) Standards for  the education and training of school personnel to manage students with life-
threatening allergies or adrenal insufficiency.
(B) Procedures for responding to life-threatening allergic reactions  or an adrenal crisis, as de-
fined in ORS 433.800.
(C) A process for the development of individualized health  care and allergy or adrenal insuffi-
ciency plans for every student with a known life-threatening allergy or adrenal insufficiency.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 21
(D) Protocols for preventing exposures to allergens.
(e) Rules for the administration of a  short-acting opioid antagonist to any student or other in-
dividual on school premises who the  individual administering the short-acting opioid antagonist be-
lieves in good faith is experiencing an opioid overdose.
(2)(a) School district boards shall adopt policies and procedures that provide for:
(A) The administration of prescription and  nonprescription medication to students by trained
school personnel, including the administration of medications that treat adrenal insufficiency;
(B) Student self-medication; and
(C) The administration of premeasured doses of epinephrine to students and other individuals.
(b) Policies and procedures adopted under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be consistent
with the rules  adopted by the State Board of Education under subsection (1) of this section. A school
district board shall not require school personnel  who have not received appropriate training to ad-
minister medication.
(3)(a) School district boards may adopt  policies and procedures that provide for the adminis-
tration of a short-acting opioid antagonist.
(b) Policies and procedures adopted under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be consistent
with the rules adopted by the State Board of Education under subsection (1) of this section.
(4)(a) A school district [ board] shall provide  to the parent or legal guardian of each minor stu-
dent enrolled in a school  in the school district information regarding short-acting opioid antagonists.
The information described in this subsection must include at least:
(A) A description of short-acting opioid antagonists and their purpose;
(B) A statement regarding, in an emergency  situation, the risks of administering to an individual
a short-acting  opioid antagonist and the risks of not administering to an individual a short-acting
opioid antagonist;
[(C) A statement that  all schools within the school district have access to short-acting opioid an-
tagonists and the necessary medical supplies to administer the short-acting  opioid antagonist on site;
and]
(C) A statement identifying which schools, if any, in the school district will have  short-
acting opioid antagonists, and the necessary medical supplies  to administer short-acting
opioid antagonists, on site and available for emergency situations; and
(D) A statement that a representative of a  school may administer to a student a short-acting
opioid antagonist in  an emergency if the student appears to be unconscious and experiencing an
opioid overdose.
(b) A school district board shall  ensure that the parent or legal guardian of a minor student
enrolled in a  school within the school district is immediately notified when a short-acting opioid
antagonist is administered to the student if the short-acting opioid antagonist is administered  while
the student is at school, on school property under the jurisdiction  of the school district or at any
activity under the jurisdiction of the school district.
(c) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules that prescribe  minimum requirements
for the information provided under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 30.
Nothing in ORS 339.869 (4)(a)(C) (2023 Edition) shall be construed to:
(1) Require a school, a school district or a school  district board to provide access to
short-acting opioid antagonists, and the necessary medical supplies  to administer the short-
acting opioid antagonist, on site in all schools of the school district; or
(2) Allow a school, a school  district, a school district board, a school district employee
or a school district board member to be held liable in a criminal  action or for civil damages
for failure to provide access to short-acting opioid antagonists, and the necessary  medical
supplies to administer the short-acting opioid antagonist, on site in all schools of the  school
district.
EDUCATOR ADVANCEMENT COUNCIL
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 22
SECTION 31.  ORS 342.940 is amended to read:
342.940. [(1) As used in this section and ORS 342.943,  “educator” means a teacher, administrator
or other school professional who is  licensed, registered or certified by the Teacher Standards and
Practices Commission.]
(1) As used in this section and ORS 342.943, “educator” means a person who is:
(a) A teacher,  an administrator or another school employee who is employed to provide
instruction or  support to students in early childhood education or in kindergarten through
grade 12; or
(b) Entering into or enrolled in an educator preparation program.
(2)(a) The Educator Advancement Council shall be established and function  under an intergov-
ernmental agreement, pursuant to ORS 190.003 to 190.130, between  state agencies and one or more
school districts and education service districts. The state agencies that must be parties to the
intergovernmental agreement are the Department of Education, the  Department of Early
Learning and Care, the  Teacher Standards and Practices Commission and the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission.
(b) The purposes of the council are to provide resources related to  educator professional
learning and to provide other educator supports.
(3) The intergovernmental agreement establishing  the council shall outline the governance
framework and the administrative details necessary for the efficient and effective implementation
of the duties of the council.
(4)(a) The council shall consist of:
(A) Members who are representatives of the parties to  the intergovernmental agreement estab-
lishing the council.
(B) No more than 10 members who are practicing educators, classified  staff in a public school
or for  an education service district, early learning providers and professionals and school district
board members.
(C) No more than 10 members who are representatives of  educator preparation providers,
education-focused nonprofit organizations, education-focused philanthropic  organizations, profes-
sional education  associations, community-based education organizations that represent families and
students, post-secondary institutions  of education and federally recognized Indian tribes of this state.
(b) Subject to any limits designated as provided by the intergovernmental agreement establishing
the council, the majority of the members of the  council identified under paragraph (a) of this sub-
section may propose additional members of the council. The inclusion of additional members on  the
council shall be  subject to the procedures established by the council under the intergovernmental
agreement.
(5) The council shall:
(a) Establish a system of educator networks, as described in ORS 342.943, by  which every edu-
cator in this state has access to professional learning opportunities;
(b) Administer the beginning teacher and administrator mentorship program under ORS  329.788
to 329.820;
(c) Coordinate the distribution of moneys to educator networks from the Educator Advancement
Fund based on the needs of the educators identified by the networks;
(d) Connect educator networks and facilitate communications  within and among the networks
to improve teaching and learning; and
(e) Continuously assess the needs of educators in this state and coordinate  priorities based on
the moneys available for distribution from the Educator Advancement Fund.
(6) The Department of Education  shall provide support to the strategic direction of the council
by:
(a) Conducting and coordinating research to monitor:
(A) Teaching and learning conditions;
(B) Educator workforce supply and demand; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 23
(C) Common outcomes and measures anticipated to promote improvement in teaching  and
learning.
(b) Assisting the council in coordinating  and connecting educator networks, supporting profes-
sional learning priorities, enabling access to  professional learning and supports, leveraging funding
sources and managing innovation funds.
(c) Recommending  statutory and agency rule changes needed to support the purposes of the
council.
(d) Supporting programs that help to achieve the purposes of the Educators Equity Act.
(e) Supporting a statewide plan for increasing:
(A) The supply of culturally diverse teacher candidates; and
(B) The successful recruitment of effective educators to work  in high-need schools and in prac-
tice areas with a shortage of educators.
(f) Identifying high-leverage educator  practices to be developed by educators throughout their
careers.
(g) Providing accountability of the council by ensuring that the council:
(A) Gives preference, when  making recommendations about funding distributions, to entities that
have demonstrated success in improving student indicators.
(B) Considers the delivery of services for the benefit of all regions of this state when establish-
ing the system of educator networks.
(C) Works toward improving student progress indicators identified by  the Department of Edu-
cation or set forth in ORS 350.014.
(D) Includes and connects education providers and  leaders from prekindergarten through post-
secondary  education.
(h) Providing staff support for the administrative functions of the council.
(i) Developing  a system that allows for the statewide dissemination of emerging practices and
evidence-based models.
(j) Providing technical assistance to the council, including online  systems for sharing profes-
sional learning resources and supporting educator networks.
(k) Administering the distribution of grant and contract funds for programs described  in this
section.
(L) Providing administrative support to the educator networks, including:
(A) Making recommendations to the  council about the selection of the sponsors of educator
networks;
(B) Providing technical assistance to educator networks; and
(C) Entering into grant agreements or contracts for the distribution of funds  to educator net-
works.
(7)(a) The State Board of Education and the Teacher  Standards and Practices Commission may
adopt any rules necessary at the request of the council to support the council  or to perform any
duties assigned to the board or commission under this section.
(b) The council may adopt rules pursuant to ORS chapter 183 for the purposes of ORS  329.788
to 329.820 and 342.943.
(8) The council shall be considered a board for purposes of ORS chapter 180.
SECTION 32.
Notwithstanding ORS 329.805 (2), grants awarded under  ORS 329.805 during
the 2023-2025 biennium are not required to be awarded on a competitive basis.
COREQUISITE STUDENT SUPPORT
SECTION 33. (1) As used in this  section, “corequisite” means a course or requirement
related to mathematics or  writing that a student must take or satisfy at the same time that
the student is taking or  satisfying another course or requirement in mathematics or writing
that is required for a program of study or a degree.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 24
(2) The  Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall convene a work group to study
evidence-based corequisite student support models, including models that use in-class  tutor-
ing, online learning labs, paired courses and other aligned academic supports. The  work
group shall provide information to the commission to assist the commission in:
(a) Determining whether to require the community colleges  in this state to implement
evidence-based corequisite student support models and identifying the most effective models
to implement;
(b) Identifying the steps and resources required for community colleges  in this state to
transition from  traditional prerequisite development education to evidence-based corequisite
student support models;
(c) Identifying the steps and resources required for community  colleges in this state to
implement corequisite  student support models in conjunction with courses of study in
mathematics;
(d) Determining whether  evidence-based corequisite student support models should be
funded by Community College Support Fund grants;
(e) Identifying any statutory changes or administrative rule changes necessary to provide
and fund evidence-based corequisite student support models; and
(f) Identifying how to determine if a person  should participate in a corequisite, and
whether participation should be voluntary or mandatory.
(3)(a) The work  group convened under this section shall be appointed by the executive
director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission and shall include:
(A) The Director of the Office of Community Colleges and Workforce Development, or
the director’s designee;
(B) One representative of a  research center focused on the policies and practices of
community colleges in this state;
(C) Three community college faculty members who have  experience in teaching
corequisite or developmental education;
(D) Three community college faculty members who have experience in teaching the  first
credit-bearing college-level course in mathematics or writing;
(E) One representative of a  statewide organization representing community college fac-
ulty members;
(F) One community college president;
(G) One chief academic officer or chief instructional administrator for a community col-
lege;
(H) One developmental education or adult basic  education administrator for a community
college;
(I) One student services administrator or professional for a community college; and
(J) One community college student.
(b) The commission  shall solicit nominations from organizations representing faculty,
students and community colleges to determine the membership of the work group.
(4) No later than December 15, 2024, the work group shall submit to the Higher Education
Coordinating Commission a report on the study conducted as provided by this section.
SECTION 34.
Section 33 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
APPLIED BACCALAUREATE PROGRAMS
SECTION 35.  ORS 341.013 is amended to read:
341.013. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Applied baccalaureate degree” has the meaning given that term in ORS 348.910.
(b) “Bachelor of Science: Nursing degree” means  a post-licensure degree program in which in-
dividuals who have  already received an associate degree in nursing receive a bachelor’s degree in
nursing.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 25
(2) A community college may offer applied baccalaureate degrees and Bachelor of  Science:
Nursing degrees under the provisions of this section.
(3) For each applied baccalaureate degree program or  Bachelor of Science: Nursing degree
program a community college wants  to offer to its students, the community college shall submit to
the Higher Education Coordinating Commission:
(a) A description of the program to be offered;
(b) The method by which the program will be created, including  any necessary accreditation by
the relevant accrediting agency;
(c) Documentation of local unmet workforce needs that would be addressed by offering the pro-
gram; and
(d) Documentation that the community college has the expertise,  resources and student interest
necessary to make the program successful.
(4) A proposed applied baccalaureate degree program or Bachelor  of Science: Nursing degree
program must be approved by the commission.  The commission shall approve a proposed applied
baccalaureate degree program or Bachelor of Science: Nursing degree program if:
(a) The community college submits all  of the information and documentation required under
subsection (3) of this section; and
(b) The commission determines that the criteria set forth in ORS 350.075 (3)(g) are satisfied.
(5) An applied baccalaureate degree program or Bachelor of Science: Nursing  degree
program that is approved by the commission is eligible for funding  from the Community
College Support Fund established in ORS 341.620.
[(5)] (6) The commission may adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 36.
(1) The amendments to ORS 341.013 by section 35 of this 2024  Act become
operative January 1, 2025.
(2) The amendments to ORS 341.013 by section 35 of this  2024 Act first apply to expenses
incurred for the 2025-2026 academic year.
SECTION 37. As part of the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission’s budget pres-
entation during the 2025 regular session of the Legislative Assembly, the  commission shall
include in a report prepared in the  manner required under ORS 192.245 the following infor-
mation:
(1) The estimated impact  of funding the applied baccalaureate degree program and the
Bachelor of Science: Nursing degree program from the  Community College Support Fund
established in ORS 341.620.
(2) The extent the commission can determine the approximate  cost of funding the applied
baccalaureate degree program and the Bachelor of  Science: Nursing degree program from
the Community College Support Fund for the 2025-2026 academic year.
(3) Any recommendations for funding the applied baccalaureate degree  program or the
Bachelor of Science: Nursing degree program in a manner other than from  the Community
College Support Fund.
SECTION 38. Section 37 of this 2024 Act is repealed on June 30, 2025.
FACULTY HEALTH CARE BENEFITS
SECTION 39.  ORS 350.355 is amended to read:
350.355. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this  subsection, a part-time faculty member
at a public institution of higher education is eligible for the same employee-only health care benefits,
including dental  benefits and vision benefits, as full-time faculty members if the part-time faculty
member is eligible for  membership in the Public Employees Retirement System or another plan au-
thorized under ORS chapter  238 or 238A by [ teaching] working either at a single public institution
of higher education or in aggregate at multiple public institutions  of higher education during the
previous academic year.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 26
(b) The total cost of providing any health benefit plan offered by a public institution  of higher
education to a part-time faculty member  under this section may not increase annually by more than
the annual  increase in premium amounts paid for contracted health benefit plans that is permitted
under ORS 243.135 (8)(b) or 243.866 (9)(b).
(2)(a) In order to receive  employee-only health care benefits under this section, a part-time fac-
ulty member must select a home  public institution of higher education for the duration of the benefit
year under a process established by each institution. A home public  institution of higher education
selected under this subsection:
[(A) Must be one at which the part-time faculty member is working  during the academic term at
the time of the application; and ]
(A) Must be one from which the part-time  faculty member received a salary, a grant or
other payment  for work performed by the part-time faculty member that is substantially
similar to work  performed by a full-time faculty member, including teaching, research or
student mentorship and advising;
(B) Must be one from which the  part-time faculty member received payment, as de-
scribed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, at:
(i) The time of the application; or
(ii) Any time during the previous benefit year,  if the part-time faculty member is not
currently receiving payment from any public institution of higher education  but otherwise
is eligible for employee-only health care benefits; and
[(B)] (C) Is responsible for:
(i) Determining whether the part-time faculty member is eligible to receive health care  benefits
under this section;
(ii) Determining, on an annual basis, whether a part-time faculty member who was found  to be
eligible to receive health care  benefits under sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph continues
to be eligible to receive health care benefits under this section;
(iii) Collecting  the premiums for health benefit plans that must be paid by the part-time faculty
member under subsection (3) of this section;
(iv) Paying the full cost of the insurance  premiums for providing health benefit plans to the
part-time faculty member, subject to reimbursement as described in subsection  (4) of this section;
and
(v) Administering and providing health benefit  plans to the part-time faculty member in the
manner described in this section.
(b) In order to receive health care benefits under this section, a part-time faculty member must
provide the home public institution of  higher education with all information necessary for the in-
stitution to determine the eligibility of the part-time faculty member to receive health  care benefits
under this section.
(c) No later than 30 days before the deadline to submit an application  to receive health care
benefits under this section, each public institution of higher education  must notify all part-time
faculty members who  have been employed by the institution during the current academic year and
the previous academic year of:
(A) The eligibility requirements to receive health benefits under this section;
(B) The health  care benefits and associated costs available to qualifying part-time faculty mem-
bers; and
(C) Instructions on how part-time faculty members may apply to  receive health care benefits
under this section.
(3)(a) Except as provided in  paragraph (b) of this subsection, a part-time faculty member at a
public institution of higher education shall pay 10 percent of all  insurance premiums for health
benefit plans.
(b) A public institution  of higher education may provide by collective bargaining at the institu-
tion to pay for some or all of  the insurance premiums that must otherwise be paid by a part-time
faculty member under paragraph (a) of this subsection.  The public institution of higher education
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 27
may not be reimbursed under subsection (4) of this  section for the costs the institution incurs to
provide health benefit plans under this paragraph.
(4)(a) Every three  months a public institution of higher education may request reimbursement
from the Higher Education Coordinating Commission for the cost of paying insurance premiums for
providing health benefit plans to each part-time faculty member who has selected the institution  as
the faculty member’s home public institution  of higher education under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) The commission shall  use moneys from the Part-Time Faculty Insurance Fund established
under ORS 350.357 to fully reimburse  each public institution of higher education for all documented
costs requested by the institution under this subsection,  except for any costs described in subsection
(3) of this section.
(5) Unless otherwise provided for by collective bargaining, a part-time faculty member at  a
public institution  of higher education who is eligible for health care benefits under subsection (1)
of this section may receive health care benefits only in the manner provided by this section.
(6) Each agency request budget filed by the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission under
ORS 291.208 must include, as part  of the budget, moneys sufficient to provide health care benefits
to part-time faculty members in the manner required by this section.
(7) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may adopt rules necessary  to implement
subsection (4) of this section.
FORESTRY WORKFORCE STUDY
SECTION 40.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Forestry sector” means private businesses, nonprofit organizations, educational  and
workforce providers and public entities that are engaged in logging, forestation, wildland fire
prevention and suppression,  construction and maintenance of roads required for forestry,
aggregate production of forestry products, trucking related to forestry,  tree services, tech-
nical and professional services  required for forestry, forest surveying, fuel mitigation efforts
related to  forestry, forestry habitat restoration, watershed improvement, crop tree release
and stand improvement, forest tract management, tree nurseries,  mechanical services for
forestry, provision of forestry products, training resources for the forestry workforce, edu-
cational resources  for the forestry workforce, human resources for the forestry workforce
and other in-forest or forest-affiliated services.
(b) “Forestry workforce” means the  owners, proprietors, partners and employees of
companies and organizations composing the forestry sector.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall conduct a forestry  workforce
study to assist the commission  in understanding and addressing challenges in Oregon’s
forestry workforce.
(3) The study conducted under this section shall:
(a) Identify existing secondary and post-secondary education,  training, apprenticeship
and workforce development programs that prepare Oregonians  for careers in the forestry
workforce;
(b) Collect data on participation  in, completion of and employment outcomes for pro-
grams identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(c) Identify the number, type and location  of businesses, nonprofit organizations, educa-
tion and workforce providers and public entities composing the forestry sector in this  state;
(d) Collect data on the number, occupations, industries, wages and  demographics of the
forestry workforce in this state;
(e) Assess current and projected forestry workforce needs;
(f) Identify  challenges faced by the forestry sector in retaining and recruiting the
forestry workforce; and
(g) Develop recommendations to  enhance the recruitment and retention of the forestry
workforce.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 28
(4) When conducting the study under this section, the commission shall:
(a) Assess the current forestry workforce, the workforce’s demographics and  needs and
the community benefits of  forestry. The assessment required under this paragraph shall take
into consideration state plans and initiatives related to forest health, climate and economic
development that may influence the demands on the forestry workforce.
(b) Collaborate with Oregon business associations that represent private forest employers
and forest management enterprises to assess the future forestry workforce capacity re-
quirements, as well as  the potential impacts, benefits and opportunities for the forestry
workforce.
(c) Consult with state and federal economic development, labor, employment  and licens-
ing agencies to account for current tracking and monitoring  techniques for the forestry
workforce and to ensure that the study is not duplicative of other studies.
(d) Consult with state  and federal natural resource agencies to align priorities and un-
derstand future forestry workforce needs.
(e) Consult with state training and education agencies to fully understand career  path-
ways and training opportunities for the forestry workforce.
(5) The  commission may enter into a contract with a public or private entity for the
purpose of conducting the study described in this section.
(6) The commission shall  submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to natural resources, education and
higher education no later than June 30, 2025.
SECTION 41.
Section 40 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 42. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June 30,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $300,000, for the purpose of the study described
in section 40 of this 2024 Act.
TRANSFER COUNCIL SUBCOMMITTEES
SECTION 43.
 ORS 192.690 is amended to read:
192.690. (1) ORS 192.610 to 192.705 do not apply to any of the following:
(a) Deliberations  of the Psychiatric Security Review Board or the State Board of Parole and
Post-Prison Supervision.
(b) Deliberations of state agencies  conducting hearings on contested cases in accordance with
the provisions of ORS chapter 183.
(c) Deliberations of the Workers’ Compensation  Board or the Employment Appeals Board of
similar hearings on contested cases.
(d) Meetings of the state lawyers  assistance committee operating under the provisions of ORS
9.568.
(e) Meetings of the personal and practice  management assistance committees operating under
the provisions of ORS 9.568.
(f) Meetings of county child abuse multidisciplinary teams required to review child  abuse cases
in accordance with the provisions of ORS 418.747.
(g) Meetings of child fatality review teams required to  review child fatalities in accordance with
the provisions of ORS 418.785.
(h) Meetings of peer review committees in accordance with the provisions of ORS 441.055.
(i) Mediation conducted under ORS 36.252 to 36.268.
(j) Any judicial proceeding.
(k) Meetings of  the Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors or its designated
committee regarding candidates for the position of president of the university or regarding sensitive
business, financial or commercial matters of the university not customarily provided to  competitors
related to financings, mergers, acquisitions or joint  ventures or related to the sale or other dispo-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 29
sition of, or substantial change in use of, significant real or personal property,  or related to health
system strategies.
(L) Oregon Health and Science University faculty or staff committee meetings.
(m) Meetings of  Transfer Council subcommittees that are established under ORS 350.426
and that relate to the  common course numbering system and the coordination, establish-
ment, alignment, effectiveness and maintenance of foundational curricula.
[(m)] (n) Communications between or among members of a governing body that are:
(A) Purely factual or educational in nature  and that convey no deliberation or decision on any
matter that might reasonably come before the governing body;
(B) Not related to any matter that, at any time, could  reasonably be foreseen to come before the
governing body for deliberation and decision; or
(C) Nonsubstantive in nature, such as communication relating to scheduling, leaves of  absence
and other similar matters.
(2) Because of the grave risk to public health and safety that  would be posed by misappropri-
ation or misapplication of information considered during such review  and approval, ORS 192.610 to
192.705 shall not apply to review and approval  of security programs by the Energy Facility Siting
Council pursuant to ORS 469.530.
EDUCATION FOR OCCUPATIONAL OR PROFESSIONAL LICENSE
SECTION 44.
 ORS 670.280 is amended to read:
670.280. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “License” includes a registration, certification or permit.
(b) “Licensee” includes a registrant or a holder of a certification or permit.
(2) Except as provided in ORS 342.143  (3) or 342.175 (3), a licensing board, commission or agency
may not deny, suspend or revoke an occupational  or professional license solely for the reason that
the applicant  or licensee has been convicted of a crime, but it may consider the relationship of the
facts which support the conviction  and all intervening circumstances to the specific occupational
or professional standards in  determining the fitness of the person to receive or hold the license.
There is a rebuttable presumption as  to each individual applicant or licensee that an existing or
prior conviction for conduct  that has been classified or reclassified as a Class E violation does not
make an applicant for an occupational or professional license or  a licensee with an occupational or
professional license unfit to receive or hold the license.
(3) Except as provided in ORS 342.143 (3) and  342.175 (3), a licensing board, commission or
agency may deny an occupational or professional license or impose discipline on a licensee  based
on conduct that is not undertaken directly in the course of the licensed activity,  but that is sub-
stantially related to the fitness and ability of the applicant or licensee to  engage in the activity for
which the  license is required. In determining whether the conduct is substantially related to the
fitness and ability of the applicant or licensee to engage in the activity for which the license  is re-
quired, the licensing board, commission  or agency shall consider the relationship of the facts with
respect to the conduct and all intervening circumstances  to the specific occupational or professional
standards. There is a rebuttable presumption as  to each individual applicant or licensee that an
existing or  prior conviction for conduct that has been classified or reclassified as a Class E violation
is not related to the fitness and ability of the applicant or licensee  to engage in the activity for
which the license is required.
(4)(a) Prior to beginning an education, a training or an apprenticeship program for  an
occupational or professional license, a person who was convicted  of a crime may petition a
licensing board, commission  or agency for a determination as to whether a criminal con-
viction will prevent the person from receiving an  occupational or professional license. The
licensing board, commission  or agency may charge a reasonable fee to pay the costs of
making the determination.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 30
(b) A determination from a licensing board, commission or agency  that a criminal con-
viction will not prevent  the person from obtaining an occupational or professional license
may be rescinded if, at the time the person submits a complete application, the person:
(A) Has allegations or charges pending in criminal court;
(B) Has failed to disclose a previous criminal conviction;
(C) Has been convicted of another crime during the period between the determination and
the person’s submission of a  completed application for an occupational or professional li-
cense; or
(D) Has been convicted of a crime that, during the period between the determination and
the person’s submission of a completed application for an  occupational or professional li-
cense, became  subject to a change in state or federal law that prohibits licensure for an oc-
cupational or professional license because of a conviction of that crime.
(c) A  licensing board, commission or agency shall reconsider a determination that a
criminal conviction will prevent the person from obtaining an occupational  or professional
license if the person submits a completed application for an occupational  or professional li-
cense.
(d) A determination made under this subsection:
(A) Shall be made by  the same entity that reviews completed applications for an occu-
pational or professional license for the licensing board, commission or agency;
(B) Shall be subject to the same confidentiality requirements that are  applicable to
completed applications for an occupational or professional license for the licensing board,
commission or agency; and
(C) Is not considered a  final determination of the licensing board, commission or agency.
(e) Nothing in this subsection  prohibits a licensing board, commission or agency from
denying licensure for a reason other than conviction of a crime.
(f) A licensing board, commission  or agency may adopt rules necessary to implement the
provisions of this subsection.
(g) This subsection does not apply to the  Department of Public Safety Standards and
Training or to any regulation of psilocybin services.
SECTION 44a.
(1) The amendments to ORS 670.280 by section 44 of this 2024 Act  become
operative on July 1, 2025.
(2) Notwithstanding the operative date set forth in subsection  (1) of this section, a li-
censing board, commission or agency may choose  to make determinations as described in
ORS 670.280 (4) before the operative date set forth in subsection (1) of this section.
RECOVERY SCHOOLS
SECTION 45.  ORS 336.680 is amended to read:
336.680. (1) As used in this section, “approved recovery school” means a school that  is under
an agreement with the Department of  Education to provide students enrolled in the school with a
holistic approach to:
(a) Educational services for grades 9 through 12; and
(b) Health care services related to recovery from substance use disorders.
(2) The department shall provide  or cause to be provided appropriate education for students
enrolled in an  approved recovery school. For the purpose of paying the costs of providing education
to students enrolled in an approved recovery  school, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
make the following:
(a) Payments from amounts available from the State School Fund under ORS 327.029.
(b) Payments from the Statewide Education Initiatives Account, as provided by rule adopted  by
the State Board of Education in  collaboration with the advisory committee convened under ORS
336.685. The rules adopted as provided by this paragraph may include a  minimum amount, a maxi-
mum amount or both for approved recovery schools.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 31
(3) The Superintendent of Public  Instruction may contract with a school district, an education
service district or a public charter school to provide or cause to  be provided appropriate education
to students enrolled in an approved recovery  school.  Unless  otherwise specified, any educational
services provided under a contract entered into  under this subsection shall be paid as described in
this section and not by any other state moneys distributed based on average daily  membership that
are available to the school district, education service district or public charter school for the pur-
pose of providing educational services.
(4) The State Board of Education shall adopt by rule the standards for a  recovery school to
become and operate as an approved recovery school. The standards must provide that:
(a) The recovery  school must align, to the extent identified by the board, with standards for
accreditation established by a nonprofit accrediting organization composed of representatives of  re-
covery schools and individuals who support the growth of recovery schools. The standards must in-
clude requirements that:
(A) The recovery school, in compliance with timelines established by the department, be ac-
credited by a nonprofit accrediting  organization that establishes standards for recovery schools.
Nothing in this subparagraph requires the  recovery school to be accredited at the time the super-
intendent first enters into a contract with the recovery school.
(B) Student enrollment in the recovery school is voluntary. No school  district or state or local
agency may compel or otherwise  require a student to enroll in a recovery school. Students enrolled
in an approved recovery school may not be counted in determining  the number of pupils in average
daily membership for purposes of ORS 334.175 (5).
(C) All students who reside in this state and who meet the eligibility criteria established under
subsection (8) of this section may enroll in an  approved recovery school if space is available. If
space is not available, the approved recovery school may prioritize for  enrollment student groups
identified in ORS 327.180 (2)(b).
(D) The  school district, education service district or public charter school with which the de-
partment has entered into a contract for a recovery  school must agree to award high school diplo-
mas, modified diplomas,  extended diplomas and alternative certificates as provided by ORS 329.451
and 339.877. An entity that awards high school diplomas as provided by this subparagraph:
(i) May  not impose requirements for a high school diploma that are in addition to the require-
ments prescribed by ORS 329.451 (2)(a) or by rule of the State Board of Education; and
(ii) Must accept any credits previously  earned by students in another school or educational
program in  this state and apply those credits toward the requirements prescribed by ORS 329.451
(2)(a) or by rule of the State Board of Education.
(E) Except as provided by [ subparagraph (F) ] subparagraphs (F) and (G) of this paragraph, the
recovery school must satisfy the same laws that apply  to public charter schools under ORS 338.115.
(F) All administrators and teachers at the recovery school must be licensed by the Teacher
Standards and Practices Commission.
(G) An approved recovery school is  not required to comply with the enrollment require-
ments prescribed by ORS 338.115 (1)(bb) or (5).
(H) An approved recovery  school must comply with the requirements of the uniform
budget and accounting system adopted by rule of the State Board of Education under ORS
327.511.
(b) Recovery schools will be approved, to the greatest extent practicable, in a manner that:
(A) Represents a geographic distribution across this state; and
(B) Takes into consideration the  needs for services by the community in which the recovery
school would be located.
(5) Any school that provides the services of a recovery school  may enter into a contract with
the superintendent to become an approved recovery school, including schools already providing the
services of a recovery school and schools that are proposing to provide the services of a  recovery
school.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 32
(6) An approved recovery school may enter into agreements with other  entities, including
community-based organizations and federally  recognized tribes of this state, for the purposes of
providing educational and health care services to students  enrolled in the approved recovery school.
(7)(a) The department shall be responsible for:
(A) Identifying, locating and evaluating students enrolled in an approved  recovery school who
may be in need of special education and related services; and
(B) Ensuring that eligible students receive special education and related services.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection, the  department may enter into a contract with a school
district or an education service district.
(8) The department shall establish eligibility criteria for students to enroll in an approved re-
covery school, based on input from the advisory committee  convened under ORS 336.685 and based
on research from a  nonprofit organization composed of representatives of recovery schools and in-
dividuals who support the growth of recovery schools and other relevant organizations.
(9) For the purposes of administering this section:
(a) The State Board of Education shall adopt any necessary rules.
(b) The department shall collaborate with the Oregon Health Authority, the Youth Development
Division, the Alcohol  and Drug Policy Commission, the Oregon Youth Authority, the Department
of Human Services and local  public health and mental health authorities or providers and shall co-
ordinate, to the greatest extent practicable,  funding of services provided in relation to approved
recovery schools.
(10) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall prepare a report on the  progress, suc-
cesses and challenges of approved recovery schools and submit that report to:
(a) The interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education; and
(b) The advisory committee convened under ORS 336.685.
EMPLOYMENT OF CLASSIFIED SCHOOL EMPLOYEES
SECTION 46.
 ORS 332.544 is amended to read:
332.544. (1) As used  in this section, “classified school employee” includes all employees of a
school district in a position  represented by a collective bargaining unit,  except those for whom
a teaching or administrative license is required as a basis for employment in a school district.
(2) A classified school employee shall  have the right to be dismissed, demoted or disciplined only
for just cause.
(3) School district employees subject to the civil service provisions of  ORS 242.310 to 242.640
are exempt from the provisions of this section.
SECTION 47.  ORS 334.231 is amended to read:
334.231. (1) As used in this section, “classified  school employee” includes all employees of an
education service district  in a position represented by a collective bargaining unit,  except those
for whom a teaching or administrative license is required as a basis for employment  in an education
service district.
(2) A classified school employee shall  have the right to be dismissed, demoted or disciplined only
for just cause.
SUBSTITUTE TEACHER PAY
SECTION 48.  ORS 342.610 is amended to read:
342.610. (1)(a) A teacher employed as a substitute teacher may not be paid less  per day than 85
percent of 1/190th of the statewide average salary of  a beginning teacher who holds a bachelor’s
degree.
(b) The Department of Education shall compute the statewide average salary of a  beginning
teacher who holds a bachelor’s degree to be used for purposes of this subsection by:
(A) Using the latest data available to the department; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 33
(B) Not using data from earlier than the preceding school year.
(2) A school district shall set the working hours for a  substitute teacher and, when a teacher
is employed as a substitute teacher for the school district, the school district shall pay the substitute
teacher a salary that is:
(a) No less  than one-half of the daily minimum salary computed under subsection (1) of this
section if the teacher is employed as a  substitute teacher for one-half day or less than one-half day;
or
(b) No  less than the daily minimum salary computed under subsection (1) of this section if the
teacher is employed as a substitute teacher for more than  one-half day [ or more ].
(3)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a teacher  employed as a substitute teacher
for more than 10 consecutive days in any one  assignment for the same teacher shall not be paid
after the 10th day of the assignment less per day than:
(A) For school districts with no salary  scale, 100 percent of 1/190th of the statewide average
salary computed in subsection (1) of this section; or
(B) For school districts with a salary scale, the higher of:
(i) 1/190th of the employing school district’s salary for a beginning teacher  who holds a
bachelor’s degree; or
(ii) The daily minimum salary computed under subsection (1) of this section.
(b) Used sick leave, whether paid or unpaid, and weekends, school holidays  and days when
schools are closed by weather or other conditions and when  substitute teachers are not required to
appear in person at the school may not be considered in determining consecutive  days for purposes
of this subsection.
(c) When substituting for a part-time teacher,  the part of the day worked by the substitute
teacher shall count as a full day in determining consecutive days for purposes of this subsection.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and  (3) of this section, if a school district has a class
schedule based on a four-day week:
(a) The daily minimum salary computed under subsection (1) or (3) of  this section must be
multiplied by 1.125; and
(b) Calculations described in subsection (3) of this section must be made after a teacher has been
employed as a substitute teacher for more than eight consecutive days in any one assignment for
the same teacher.
(5)(a) A school district shall  classify a substitute teaching assignment as a temporary position
when the school district determines that a teacher will be employed as a substitute teacher  for 60
or more consecutive days in any one assignment for the same teacher.
(b) The designation under paragraph (a) of this subsection must occur either:
(A) At the beginning of the substitute teaching assignment; or
(B) As soon as practicable, but no later than 10 consecutive days, after  the school district de-
termines that a substitute teaching assignment will be extended to 60 or more consecutive days.
(c) If a school district has a class schedule based on a four-day week, the school district shall:
(A) Classify a substitute  teaching assignment as a temporary position when the school district
determines that a teacher will be employed as a substitute teacher for  48 or more consecutive days
in any one assignment for the same teacher; and
(B) Make the designation described in paragraph (b)(B) of this subsection when the school dis-
trict determines that a teacher will be employed as a substitute teacher for  48 or more consecutive
days in any one assignment for the same teacher.
(d) Nothing in  this subsection prohibits a school district from making the classification required
under paragraph (a) or (c) of this subsection after fewer consecutive days.
(6) A teacher employed by a school district as  a substitute teacher shall be paid for any training
that is required for that teacher to apply for or be assigned to a substitute teaching assignment.
(7) This section does not apply to  substitute teachers represented in a bargaining unit in the
school district by which they are employed.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 34
SECTION 49. The amendments to ORS 342.610 by section 48 of this 2024 Act apply to
hours worked on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
EARLY SUCCESS READING INITIATIVE
SECTION 50. ORS 329.832 and 329.837 are repealed.
FISCAL PROVISIONS
SECTION 51. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Education by section 1 (1), chapter 449, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for operations, is increased  by $198,739, for the costs as-
sociated with implementing sections 1 to 7 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 52. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by  section 1 (1), chapter 454, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Higher Education  Coordinating Com-
mission programs and operations, is increased by $158,865,  for the costs associated with the
implementation of section 11 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 53. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Legislative Policy and Research Committee by section 15, chapter  383, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, is increased by $363,817, for the costs as-
sociated with the implementation of section 12 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 54. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (4), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for public health, is increased by $135,937, for the costs
associated with the implementation of section 44 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 55. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (7), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs,  is in-
creased by $7,200, for the costs associated with the implementation of  section 44 of this 2024
Act.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 56. The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 57. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 35
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1552 (SB 1552-B) Page 36